Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1008
Write-in votes; totals; how reported.

If the write-in vote in the county for a person pursuing a write-in campaign pursuant to section 32-615 or 32-633 totals less than five percent of the vote for such office in the county and the election commissioner or county clerk believes that such vote will not impact the outcome of the election, the number of write-in votes for that office may be counted and listed together as one total.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 302;

Laws 1999, LB 571, § 11;

Laws 2013, LB349, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 53.